Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
CHAPTER 8 Agricultural Commodities Promotion

Cross references.

Promotion of agricultural products, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VII, Sec. III, Para. II.

Georgia Development Authority, T. 50, C. 10.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Agricultural Commodity Commissions, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-26.